Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-259
Form of contribution.

The contribution of a partner may be in cash, property, or services rendered, or a promissory note or other obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 27.